Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.38.070

Out-of-state state bank becomes resulting bank—Branches in this state—RCW 30A.49.125(5) does not apply—When established and maintained—Notice to director.

(1) Any out-of-state state bank that will be the resulting bank pursuant to an interstate combination involving any bank with branches in Washington, if RCW 30A.49.125(5) does not apply, shall notify the director of the proposed combination not later than three days after the date of filing of an application for the combination with the responsible federal bank supervisory agency, and shall submit a copy of the application to the director and pay applicable application fees, if any, required by the director. In lieu of notice from the out-of-state state bank the director may accept notice from the bank's home state regulator. The director has the authority to waive any procedures required by Washington merger laws if the director finds that the provision is in conflict with the applicable federal law or in conflict with the applicable law of the state of the resulting bank.

(2) An out-of-state state bank that has established and maintains a branch in this state pursuant to this chapter shall give at least thirty days' prior written notice or, in the case of an emergency transaction, shorter notice as is consistent with the applicable state or federal law, to the director of any transaction that would cause a change of control with respect to the bank or any bank holding company that controls the bank, with the result that an application would be required to be filed pursuant to the federal change in bank control act of 1978, as amended, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1817(j), or the federal bank holding company act of 1956, as amended, 12 U.S.C. Sec. 1841 et seq., or any successor statutes. In lieu of notice from the out-of-state state bank the director may accept notice from the bank's home state regulator.

[ 2014 c 37 s 210; 1996 c 2 s 17. Formerly RCW 30.38.070.]